Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-6405
Property tax levy; required.

Any county that imposes a sales and use tax pursuant to the Qualified Judgment Payment Act shall set its property tax levy at the maximum levy authorized in section 77-3442 for each year that the county is imposing such sales and use tax. The county shall use any available revenue from the imposition of such levy to pay the qualified judgment.

Laws 2019, LB472, § 5.
January 1, 2027